Idaho, session 2026, H0736.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-903, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-903. SECRETARY OF STATE TO PRESCRIBE FORM AND CONTENTS OF ALL BAL-
LOTS AND RELATED DOCUMENTS. (1) The secretary of state shall, in a manner
consistent with the election laws of this state, prescribe the form for all
ballots, absentee ballots, diagrams, sample ballots, voting machine labels
or booklets, certificates, notices, declarations of candidacy, affidavits
of all types, lists, applications, poll books, tally sheets, registers,
rosters, statements, and abstracts if required by the election laws of this
state.
(2) The secretary of state shall prescribe the arrangement of the mat-
ter to be printed on each kind of ballot and label, including:
(a) The placement and listing of all offices, candidates, and issues
upon which voting is statewide, which shall be uniform throughout the
state.; and
(b) The listing of all other candidates required to file with him, and
the order of listing all offices, candidates, and issues upon which vot-
ing is not statewide.
(3) The names of candidates for legislative or special district offices
shall be printed only on the ballots furnished to voters of such district.
(4)(a) The order of the names of candidates that appear on election bal-
lots for federal, state, county, and city local offices shall be rotated
in the manner determined by the secretary of state for any political en-
tity whose number of registered voters at the last general election ex-
ceeded twenty-five thousand (25,000).
(b) The names of candidates that appear on election ballots for other
offices shall be rotated in the manner determined by the secretary of
state for any political entity whose number of registered voters at the
last general election exceeds one hundred thousand (100,000).
(c) (b) The order of names of candidates for office in all other elec-
tions shall be determined by applying the first letter of each candi-
date's last name to a random alphabet selected prior to each election by
the secretary of state.
(5) No candidate's name may appear on a ballot for more than one (1) par-
tisan office or one (1) judicial office, except that a candidate for precinct
committeeman may seek one (1) additional office upon the same ballot. The


provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the election of electors of
president and vice president of the United States.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.